Tennessee statutes. Title 43 Agriculture And Horticulture
Chapter 2

State Board of Agriculture [Repealed]

43-2-101 — 43-2-106. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 2, §§ 43-2-101 — 43-2-106 (Acts 1941, ch. 122, §§ 1-6; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 442.2-442.7 (Williams, §§ 442.2-442.7); Acts 1976, ch. 806, § 1 (6); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 43-201 — 43-206), concerning the state board of agriculture was repealed by Acts 1980, ch. 737, § 3.